Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB190.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 238.540 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
(1) Charitable gaming shall be conducted by a licensed charitable organization at the location, date, and time
which shall be stated on the license. The licensee shall request a change in the date, time, or location of a
charitable gaming event by mail, electronic mail, or facsimile transmission, and shall submit a lease and an
original signature of an officer. The office shall process this request and issue or deny a license within ten (10)
days.
(2) All premises or facilities on which or in which charitable gaming is conducted shall meet all applicable
federal, state, and local code requirements relating to life, safety, and health.
(3) A license to conduct charitable gaming shall be prominently displayed on or in the premises where charitable
gaming is conducted, in a conspicuous location that is readily accessible to gaming patrons as well as
employees of the office, law enforcement officials, and other interested officials.
(4) At least one (1) chairperson who is listed on the application for licensure shall be at each charitable gaming
activity conducted by the charitable organization and shall be responsible for the administration and conduct of
the charitable gaming activity. A[No] person shall not serve as chairperson for more than one (1) charitable
organization. The chairperson shall be readily identifiable as the chairperson and shall be present on the
premises continuously during the charitable gaming activity. Charitable gaming shall be conducted and
administered solely by officers, members, and bona fide employees of the licensed charitable organization.
Volunteer personnel, who may or may not be members of the licensed charitable organization, may be utilized
if each volunteer is readily identifiable as a volunteer. A person may serve as volunteer personnel for up to
six (6) charitable gaming events or sessions per week. A[No] person engaged in the conduct and
administration of charitable gaming shall not receive any compensation for services related to the charitable
gaming activities, including tipping.[ No] Net receipts derived from charitable gaming shall not inure to the
private benefit or financial gain of any individual. Any effort or attempt to disguise any other type of
compensation or private inurement shall be considered an unauthorized diversion of funds and shall be
actionable under KRS 238.995.
(5) A[No] licensed charitable organization shall not contract with, or otherwise utilize the services of, any
management company, service company, or consultant in managing or conducting any aspect of charitable
gaming.
(6) A licensed charitable organization shall not purchase or lease charitable gaming supplies and equipment from
any person not licensed as a distributor in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(7) A licensed charitable organization shall not accept any merchandise prizes donated by any owner, officer,
employee, or contractee of a licensed manufacturer, distributor, charitable gaming facility, or any of their
affiliates, or any member of their immediate families.
(8) (a) Each organization's gaming supplies shall be maintained in a location separate from another
organization's gaming supplies.
(b) This location shall also be locked and access shall be controlled.
(c) Unless otherwise directed by the office, an organization's supplies and equipment remain the property
of the organization regardless of where they are stored and must be accessible to the organization at all
reasonable times upon request.
(9) Any advertisement of charitable gaming, regardless of the medium used, shall contain the name of the
charitable organization conducting the charitable gaming and its license number. An advertisement for a bingo
session or sessions shall not advertise a bingo prize in excess of the limitation of five thousand dollars ($5,000)
per twenty-four (24) hour period set forth in KRS 238.545(1).
Section 2. KRS 238.545 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) A licensed charitable organization shall be limited by the following:
(a) In the conduct of bingo, to one (1) session per day, three (3)[two (2)] sessions per week, for a period
not to exceed five (5) consecutive hours in any day and not to exceed fifteen (15)[ten (10)] total hours
per week:
1. A[No] licensed charitable organization shall not conduct bingo at more than one (1) location
during the same twenty-four (24) hour period;
2. A[No] licensed charitable organization shall not award prizes for bingo that exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) in fair market value per twenty-four (24) hour period, including the value of
door prizes; and
3. A[No] person under the age of eighteen (18) shall not be permitted to purchase bingo supplies or
play bingo unless he or she is playing for noncash prizes and is accompanied by a parent or legal
guardian and only if the value of any noncash prize awarded does not exceed ten dollars ($10);
(b) 1. A licensed charitable organization may provide card-minding devices for use by players of bingo
games.
2. If a licensed charitable organization offers card-minding devices for use by players, the devices
shall be capable of being used in conjunction with bingo cards or paper sheets at all times.
3. The office shall have broad authority to define and regulate the use of card-minding devices and
the corporation shall promulgate an administrative regulation concerning use and control of
them;
(c) Charity game tickets shall be sold only at the address of the location designated on the license to
conduct charitable gaming;
(d) Charity game tickets may be sold, with prior approval of the office:
1. At any authorized special charity fundraising event conducted by a licensed charitable
organization at any off-site location; or
2. By a licensed charitable organization possessing a special limited charitable gaming license at
any off-site location; and
(e) An automated charity game ticket dispenser may be utilized by a licensed charitable organization, with
the prior approval of the office, only at the address of the location designated on the license to conduct
charitable gaming. The corporation shall promulgate administrative regulations regulating the use and
control of approved automated charity game ticket dispensers.
(2) (a) A[No] prize for an individual charity game ticket shall not exceed five hundred ninety-nine dollars
($599) in value, not including the value of cumulative or carryover prizes awarded in seal card games.
(b) Cumulative or carryover prizes in seal card games shall not exceed two thousand four hundred dollars
($2,400).
(c) Information concerning rules of the particular game and prizes that are to be awarded in excess of fifty
dollars ($50) in each separate package or series of packages with the same serial number and all rules
governing the handling of cumulative or carryover prizes in seal card games shall be posted
prominently in an area where charity game tickets are sold. A legible poster that lists prizes to be
awarded, and on which prizes actually awarded are posted at the completion of the sale of each separate
package shall satisfy this requirement.
(d) Any unclaimed money or prize shall return to the charitable organization.
(e) A[No] paper charity game ticket shall not be sold in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that does not
conform to the standards for opacity, randomization, minimum information, winner protection, color,
and cutting established by the office.
(f) An[No] electronic pulltab device representation of a charity game ticket shall not be sold in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky that does not conform to the construction standards set forth in an
administrative regulation promulgated by the corporation. Electronic pulltab devices shall only be used
for charitable gaming.

CHAPTER 28 3
(g) A[No] person under the age of eighteen (18) shall not be permitted to purchase, or open in any manner,
a charity game ticket.
(3) (a) Tickets for a raffle shall be sold separately, and each ticket shall constitute a separate and equal chance
to win.
(b) All raffle tickets shall be sold for the price stated on the ticket, and a[no] person shall not be required to
purchase more than one (1) ticket or to pay for anything other than a ticket to enter a raffle.
(c) Raffle tickets and tickets for charity fundraising raffle games approved by the office which are offered
exclusively at charity fundraising events and special limited charity fundraising events are not required
to be sold separately and may be sold at discounted package rates.
(d) Raffle tickets shall have a unique identifier on each ticket.
(e) Winners shall be drawn at random at a date, time, and place announced in advance or printed on the
ticket.
(f) All prizes for a raffle shall be identified in advance of the drawing and all prizes identified shall be
awarded.
(4) With respect to charity fundraising events, a licensed charitable organization shall be limited as follows:
(a) A[No] licensed charitable organization shall not conduct a charity fundraising event or a special limited
charity fundraising event unless they have a license for the respective event issued by the office;
(b) A[No] special license shall not be required for any wheel game, such as a cake wheel, that awards only
noncash prizes the value of which does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100);
(c) The office may grant approval for a licensed charitable organization to play bingo games at a charity
fundraising event. Cash prizes for bingo games played during a charity fundraising event may not
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the entire event. A[No] person under the age of eighteen (18)
shall not be permitted to play bingo at a charity fundraising event unless accompanied by a parent or
legal guardian;
(d) The office may grant approval for a licensed charitable organization to play special limited charitable
games at a charity fundraising event authorized under this section. The office shall not grant approval
for the playing of special limited charitable games under the provisions of a charity fundraising event
license unless the proposed event meets the definition of a charity fundraising event held for
community, social, or entertainment purposes apart from charitable gaming in accordance with KRS
238.505(8);
(e) Except for state, county, city fairs, and special limited charity fundraising events, a charity fundraising
event license issued under this section shall not exceed seventy-two (72) consecutive hours. A licensed
charitable organization shall not be eligible for more than eight (8) total charity fundraising event
licenses per year, including two (2) special limited charity fundraising event licenses. A[No] person
under eighteen (18) years of age shall not be allowed to play or conduct any special limited charitable
game. The office shall have broad authority to regulate the conduct of special limited charity
fundraising events in accordance with the provisions of KRS 238.547; and
(f) Charity fundraising events may be held:
1. On or in the premises of a licensed charitable organization;
2. In a licensed charitable gaming facility, subject to restrictions contained in KRS 238.555(7); or
3. At an unlicensed facility which shall be subject to the requirements stipulated in KRS
238.555(3), and subject to the restrictions contained in KRS 238.547(2).
(5) Presentation of false, fraudulent, or altered identification by a minor shall be an affirmative defense in any
disciplinary action or prosecution that may result from a violation of age restrictions contained in this section,
if the appearance and character of the minor were such that his or her age could not be reasonably ascertained
by other means.
Section 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025.
Signed by Governor March 18, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY